Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-253
Pupils; health inspections; violation; penalty.

Any person violating any of the provisions of sections 79-248 to 79-252 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1919, c. 241, § 6, p. 1005;

C.S.1922, § 6541;

C.S.1929, § 79-2118;

R.S.1943, § 79-2127;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 176, p. 749;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 253;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,138;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 57.